Utah statutes.
67-19-36.   Drug testing of state employees.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), when there is reasonable suspicion that an employee is using a controlled substance or alcohol unlawfully during work hours, an employee may be required to submit to medically accepted testing procedures for a determination of whether the employee is using a controlled substance or alcohol in violation of this part.

(2)  In highly sensitive positions, as identified in department class specifications, random drug testing of employees may be conducted by an agency in accordance with the rules of the executive director.

(3)  All drug or alcohol testing shall be:

(a)  conducted by a federally certified and licensed physician, a federally certified and licensed medical clinic, or testing facility federally certified and licensed to conduct medically accepted drug testing;

(b)  conducted in accordance with the rules of the executive director made under Section 67-19-34; and

(c)  kept confidential in accordance with the rules of the executive director made in accordance with Section 67-19-34.

(4)  A physician, medical clinic, or testing facility may not be held liable in any civil action brought by a party for:

(a)  performing or failing to perform a test under this section;

(b)  issuing or failing to issue a test result under this section; or

(c)  acting or omitting to act in any other way in good faith under this section.



Amended by Chapter 139, 2006 General Session

